District of Columbia statutes.
44-105.08

Notice of resident’s rights.

An ALR shall place a copy of a document delineating the resident’s rights, as set forth in this chapter, in a conspicuous location, plainly visible and easily read by residents, staff, and visitors and provide a copy to each resident and resident’s surrogate upon admission and at the time of any change to the resident’s status, level of care, or services available to the resident.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 508, 47 DCR 2647